Alabama, session 2026rs, SB362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. For purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) AGRICULTURAL ECONOMIC CHARACTER. A community where
the local economy, land use patterns, or employment base is
predominantly oriented toward farming, ranching, forestry,
aquaculture, or related agricultural production and support
activities, without regard to the community's proximity to a
metropolitan area or whether agriculture is the sole economic
activity of the community. Indicators of a community with an
agricultural economic character include, but are not limited
Page 1

agricultural economic character include, but are not limited
SB362 INTRODUCED
to, the following characteristics:
a. A significant portion of land is used or zoned for
agricultural or forestry purposes.
b. A measurable share of employment or business
activity is related to farming, livestock, timber, poultry,
row crops, or agricultural services.
c. Agricultural infrastructure, such as feed mills,
processing facilities, grain storage, farm supply businesses,
or forestry operations, is present.
d. Labor patterns are seasonal, cyclical, or otherwise
consistent with agricultural production.
(2) INDUSTRIAL ECONOMIC CHARACTER. A community where
the economy is primarily supported by manufacturing,
processing, fabrication, logistics, or distribution activities
typically located outside dense urban centers. The term
includes both legacy and modern industrial activities and may
exist within small towns or rural employment centers.
Indicators of a community with an industrial economic
character include, but are not limited to, the following
characteristics:
a. A concentration of employment in manufacturing,
processing, or industrial operations.
b. A presence of industrial parks, manufacturing
plants, or large-scale production facilities.
c. An economic reliance on a limited number of
industrial employers.
d. A presence of infrastructure designed to support
industrial activity, such as freight rail access, heavy
Page 2

industrial activity, such as freight rail access, heavy
SB362 INTRODUCED
trucking corridors, or utility-intensive facilities.
(3) METROPOLITAN COUNTY. A county included within a
metropolitan statistical area as designated by the United
States Office of Management and Budget.
(4) RESOURCE-BASED ECONOMIC CHARACTER. A community
where the economy is substantially dependent on the
extraction, cultivation, harvesting, or processing of natural
resources. The term may overlap with agricultural or
industrial economic character and is common in forested,
coastal, and mineral-rich regions of this state. Indicators of
a community with a resource-based economic character include,
but are not limited to, the following characteristics:
a. A measurable share of employment or business
activity related to timber, mining, quarrying, energy
production, fisheries, or water resources.
b. An economic sensitivity to commodity markets or
natural resource cycles.
c. A presence of geographic isolation driven by
proximity to natural resources rather than population centers.
d. A lack of economic diversification outside
resource-related industries.
(5) RURAL AREA. A municipality, unincorporated
community, or census tract designated under Alabama's tiered
rural classification system based on population, population
density, geographic isolation, commuting patterns, access to
essential services, and local economic character. A
municipality, unincorporated community, or census tract may be
considered rural regardless of the countywide metropolitan
Page 3

considered rural regardless of the countywide metropolitan
SB362 INTRODUCED
classification.
(6) URBANIZED AREA. A geographic area designated as
urban by the United States Census Bureau based on population
size, housing unit density, and land use patterns that include
densely developed cores and adjacent nonresidential urban
land.
Section 2. Rural areas may be classified into the
following tiers based on the following criteria for use by
governmental entities:
(1) Tier One - Remote and Deep Rural Communities.
Municipalities, unincorporated communities, or census tracts
that meet any of the following criteria:
a. The community has a population of 2,500 or fewer
residents or a population density of 50 or fewer individuals
per square mile.
100 b. The community is located outside of an urbanized
101 area as defined by the United States Census Bureau.
102 c. The community demonstrates geographic isolation.
103 d. The community presents limited access to health
104 care, broadband, education, workforce opportunities, or other
105 essential services.
106 e. The community exhibits constrained local
107 governmental or administrative capacity.
108 (2) Tier Two - Rural Communities. Municipalities,
109 unincorporated communities, or census tracts that meet any of
110 the following criteria:
111 a. The community has a population of 10,000 or fewer
112 residents or a population density of 200 or fewer individuals
Page 4

residents or a population density of 200 or fewer individuals
SB362 INTRODUCED
113 per square mile.
114 b. The community is not part of an urbanized area or
115 maintains a predominantly agricultural, industrial, or
116 resource-based economic character.
117 (3) Tier Three - Rural-Adjacent or Underserved
118 Communities. Municipalities, unincorporated communities, or
119 census tracts that meet any of the following criteria:
120 a. The community has a population of 20,000 or fewer
121 residents or a population density of 500 or fewer persons per
122 square mile.
123 b. The community is located within or adjacent to a
124 metropolitan county but demonstrates rural conditions, such as
125 limited infrastructure, extended travel time to essential
126 services, workforce shortages, or other economic distress.
127 Section 3. Rural classification pursuant to Section 2
128 shall be determined at the municipal, unincorporated
129 community, or census tract level and shall not be based solely
130 on countywide population totals, metropolitan status, or
131 inclusion within a metropolitan statistical area as designated
132 by the United States Office of Management and Budget.
133 Section 4. (a) A state agency may reference or
134 otherwise categorize communities using the tiered rural
135 classification schedule under Section 2 to do any of the
136 following:
137 (1) Establish eligibility thresholds for activities of
138 the agency.
139 (2) Prioritize funding, grants, incentives, or
140 technical assistance.
Page 5

technical assistance.
SB362 INTRODUCED
141 (3) Adjust matching requirements, cost-sharing
142 agreements, or administrative flexibility.
143 (4) Target resources to the most remote or underserved
144 communities.
145 (b) If an agency uses the tiered rural classification
146 schedule, the agency shall give priority consideration to
147 remote and deep rural communities where applicable.
148 (c) A community may exhibit more than one economic
149 character. Determinations shall be based on predominant
150 conditions using the most recent data available from federal,
151 state, or local sources.
152 Section 5. An agency that administers any program that
153 references the tiered rural classification schedule may adopt
154 rules to implement the tiered classification system into the
155 specific program the agency administers. These rules may
156 govern the use of population data, census designations,
157 commuting patterns, land use data, and other objective
158 indicators to assist with classification.
159 Section 6. This act shall become effective on October
160 1, 2026.
Page 6